Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-764
Blanket sickness and accident insurance; benefits, how payable.

All benefits under any blanket policy of sickness and accident insurance shall be payable to the person insured, to his or her designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, or to his or her estate, except that if the person insured is minor, such benefits may be made payable to his or her parent, guardian, or other person actually supporting him or her. All or a portion of any benefits payable under such a policy on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services may, at the insurer's option, be paid directly to the hospital or person rendering such services, but it shall not be required that the services be rendered by a particular hospital or person.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 17(3), p. 471;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 155.